Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.740

Limitation on total tuition and fee waivers.

(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for students who demonstrate financial need and are eligible for resident tuition and fee rates pursuant to RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013. Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges may waive all or a portion of tuition and fees for other students at the discretion of the governing boards, except on the basis of participation in intercollegiate athletic programs, not to exceed three-fourths of one percent of gross authorized operating fees revenue under RCW 28B.15.910 for the community and technical colleges considered as a whole and not to exceed two percent of gross authorized operating fees revenue for the other institutions of higher education.

(2) In addition to the tuition and fee waivers provided in subsection (1) of this section and subject to the provisions of RCW 28B.15.455, 28B.15.460, and 28B.15.910, a total dollar amount of tuition and fee waivers awarded by any state university, regional university, or state college under this chapter, not to exceed one percent, as calculated in subsection (1) of this section, may be used for the purpose of achieving or maintaining gender equity in intercollegiate athletic programs. At any institution that has an underrepresented gender class in intercollegiate athletics, any such waivers shall be awarded:

(a) First, to members of the underrepresented gender class who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers result in saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for the underrepresented gender class. Such saved or displaced money shall be used for programs for the underrepresented gender class; and

(b) Second, (i) to nonmembers of the underrepresented gender class who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers result in saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for members of the underrepresented gender class. Such saved or displaced money shall be used for programs for the underrepresented gender class; or (ii) to members of the underrepresented gender class who participate in intercollegiate athletics, where such waivers do not result in any saved or displaced money that can be used for athletic programs for members of the underrepresented gender class.

[ 2019 c 406 s 30; 2015 c 55 s 223; 1997 c 207 s 1; 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 9; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 28; 1992 c 231 s 26; 1989 c 340 s 2; 1986 c 232 s 3; 1985 c 390 s 33; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 9; 1980 c 62 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 262 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 262: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 262 s 5.]